Tennessee, session 114, HB0811.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-34-213, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b), a charitable organization that provides
housing to a person who the charitable organization knows is unlawfully present in the
United States may be held liable for a loss, damages, injury, or death resulting from a
criminal offense committed by the person who is unlawfully present in the United States
while the person is receiving housing services from the charitable organization if the
charitable organization's conduct in providing housing constitutes negligence, gross
negligence, or willful and wanton misconduct.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0811
000574
- 1 -